Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,128
Act, how cited.

Sections 81-15,128 to 81-15,143 shall be known and may be cited as the Wastewater Treatment Operator Certification Act.

Laws 1987, LB 533, § 1.